Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Conduct of Private Foundations

§79-11-51.
Prohibited acts.

No corporation which is a “private foundation,” as defined in Section 509(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code shall:

Engage in any act of “self-dealing,” as defined in Section 4941(d) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4941(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code;

Retain any “excess business holdings,” as defined in Section 4943(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4943(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code;

Make any investment which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of its exempt purposes, within the meaning of Section 4944 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, so as to give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4944(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code; and

Make any “taxable expenditures,” as defined in Section 4945(d) of the United States Internal Revenue Code which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4945(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-221; Laws, 1972, ch. 440, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

Laws of 1972, ch. 440, § 6, provides as follows:

“SECTION 6. Because the requirements of the Federal Tax Reform Act of 1969 require charitable nonprofit foundations, whether trusts or corporations, to change their governing instruments to comply with said federal act or the state to adopt legislation which complies in lieu of each trust or corporation changing its instrument and because failure to comply by the deadline set in said federal act will result in the loss of tax exemption by such trusts and corporations, the immediate effectiveness of this act is necessary to relieve nonprofit corporations and trusts of the concern about changing their governing instruments and retaining the tax exempt status for such Mississippi organizations; therefore, this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Similar provisions applicable to private foundation trusts, charitable trusts, and split-interest trusts, see § 91-9-401.

Section 509(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, codified as 26 USCS § 509(a).

Sections 4941, 4943-4945 of the United States Internal Revenue Code codified as 26 USCS §§ 4941, 4943-4945.

Subject to the prohibitions of Sections 79-11-51 and 79-11-53 and the federal statutes, and provided that its articles of incorporation so allow and provide, a Mississippi nonprofit corporation does have the power and authority to sell its assets and redirect its charitable activities in accordance with the state statutes cited above. Bailey, December 6, 1995, A.G. Op.
#95-0692.

Am Jur Legal Forms 2d, Federal Tax Guide to Legal Forms ¶ 190-N.

§79-11-53.
Distribution of amounts to avoid tax liability.

Each corporation which is a “private foundation,” as defined in Section 509 of the United States Internal Revenue Code shall distribute, for the purposes specified in its articles of organization, for each taxable year, amounts at least sufficient to avoid liability for the tax imposed by Section 4942(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-222; Laws, 1972, ch. 440, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

Similar provisions applicable to private foundation trusts, charitable trusts, and split-interest trusts, see § 91-9-403.

Section 509 and Section 4942(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, codified as 26 USCS § 509 and 26 USCA § 4942(a).

Subject to the prohibitions of Sections 79-11-51 and 79-11-53 and the federal statutes, and provided that its articles of incorporation so allow and provide, the Mississippi nonprofit corporation does have the power and authority to sell its assets and redirect its charitable activities in accordance with the state statutes cited above. Bailey, December 6, 1995, A.G. Op.
#95-0692.

Am Jur Legal Forms 2d, Federal Tax Guide to Legal Forms ¶ 190-N.

§79-11-55.
Applicability of Sections79-11-51 and79-11-53 when contrary to articles of organization.

The provisions of Sections 79-11-51 and 79-11-53 shall not apply to any corporation to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction shall determine that such application would be contrary to the terms of the articles of organization or other instrument governing such corporation or governing the administration of charitable funds held by it and that the same may not properly be changed to conform to such sections. The corporation shall not be liable to anyone for any payments made under Section 79-11-53 prior to such determination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-223; Laws, 1972, ch. 440, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

Similar provisions applicable to private foundation trusts, charitable trusts, and split-interest trusts, see § 91-9-405.

Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Federal Tax Guide to Legal Forms ¶ 190-N.

§79-11-57.
Amendment of articles of incorporation to exclude application of Sections79-11-51 and79-11-53.

Any corporation which is a “private foundation” (as defined in Section 509(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code) may amend its articles of incorporation expressly to exclude the application of Sections 79-11-51 and 79-11-53, or any portion thereof, in the manner provided by Section 79-4-10.01 et seq. or Sections 79-11-101 through 79-11-399, whichever is applicable. The corporation shall not be liable to anyone for any payments made under Section 79-11-53 prior to such amendment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-223; Laws, 1972, ch. 440, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 152; Laws, 2013, ch. 419, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment substituted “Section 79-4-10.01 et seq.” for “Section 79-3-117” following “in the manner provided by.”

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Business Corporation Law, see § 79-4-10.01 et seq.

Similar provisions applicable to private foundation trusts, charitable trusts, and split-interest trusts, see § 91-9-407.

Section 509(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, codified as 26 USCS § 509(a).

Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Federal Tax Guide to Legal Forms ¶ 190-N.

§79-11-59.
Rights and powers of courts and attorney general.

Nothing in Sections 79-11-51 through 79-11-61 shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the attorney general of this state with respect to any corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-224; Laws, 1972, ch. 440, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).

Similar provisions applicable to private foundation trusts, charitable trusts, and split-interest trusts, see § 91-9-409.

Office and general powers and duties of attorney general, see Chapter 5 of Title 7.

§79-11-61.
References to United States Internal Revenue Code.

All references to sections of the United States Internal Revenue Code shall be to such law as it exists as of May 4, 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-225; Laws, 1972, ch. 440, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1972).